Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 11. Dissolution.

Sec. 10.50.400.
Dissolution.

A limited liability company is dissolved and its affairs shall be wound up when the first of the following occurs:

at the time or on the happening of events specified for dissolution in an operating agreement of the company;

all of the members of the company consent in writing; or

the superior court enters a decree for judicial dissolution of the company under AS

10.50.405

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 7 ch 78 SLA 1997)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 24(a), ch. 78, SLA 1997, a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997],” and a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997], if its articles of organization are amended on or after July 1, 1997, to state that the company is to be governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997].” For the text of this section in effect on June 30, 1997, see the 1996 volume for AS 10.

Sec. 10.50.405.
Dissolution by court.

On application by or for a member of a limited liability company, the superior court may order the company dissolved if the court determines that it is impossible for the company to carry on the purposes of the company.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 8 ch 78 SLA 1997)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 24(a), ch. 78, SLA 1997, a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997],” and a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997], if its articles of organization are amended on or after July 1, 1997, to state that the company is to be governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997].” For the text of this section in effect on June 30, 1997, see the 1996 volume for AS 10.

Sec. 10.50.408.
Involuntary dissolution by commissioner.

A limited liability company may be dissolved involuntarily by the commissioner if

the company is delinquent six months in filing its biennial report or in paying a fee or a penalty;

the company has failed for 30 days to appoint and maintain a registered agent in the state;

the company has failed for 30 days after change of its registered office or registered agent to file in the office of the commissioner a statement of the change; or

a misrepresentation of material facts has been made in the application, report, affidavit, or other document submitted under this chapter.

A limited liability company may not be dissolved under this section unless the commissioner has given the company written notice of its delinquency, failure, or misrepresentation by mail as provided by (f) of this section. If the company fails, within 60 days after the notice is sent by mail as required under this subsection, to contest the alleged delinquency, failure, or misrepresentation, it may be dissolved under (d) of this section.

If, following a hearing, the commissioner determines the presence of the delinquency, failure, or misrepresentation providing grounds for involuntary dissolution under this section, the company may appeal to the superior court. The court shall either sustain the commissioner or direct the commissioner to take action the court considers proper.

If a limited liability company has given cause for involuntary dissolution and has failed to correct the neglect, omission, delinquency, or noncompliance as provided in this section, and there has not been a controlling order of the superior court, the commissioner shall dissolve the company by issuing a certificate of involuntary dissolution containing a statement that the company has been dissolved, the date, and the reason for which it was dissolved. The original certificate of dissolution shall be placed in the department files and a copy of it mailed to the company as provided by (f) of this section. Upon the issuance of the certificate of involuntary dissolution, the existence of the company ceases, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, and its name shall be available to use and may be adopted by another company on a date that is six months or later after the dissolution.

A company dissolved under this section may be reinstated within two years from the date of the certificate of involuntary dissolution if it is established to the satisfaction of the commissioner that in fact there was no cause for the dissolution, or if the delinquency, failure, or misrepresentation resulting in dissolution has been corrected and payment made of double the amount delinquent along with the amount the company would have paid had it not been dissolved during the two-year period. Reinstatement may not be authorized if the name of the company is not distinguishable upon the records of the department under AS

10.50.025

unless the company being reinstated amends its articles of organization to change its name to conform with the provisions of this chapter.

If the mailing of an item is required by (b) or (d) of this section, the commissioner shall first mail the item by certified mail to the registered office of the limited liability company at the last known address of the registered office shown on the records of the commissioner. If the item mailed to the registered office is returned to the department, the commissioner shall mail the item by first class mail to the registered agent of the limited liability company at the last known address of the registered agent shown on the records of the commissioner. If the item mailed to the registered agent is returned to the department, the commissioner shall mail the item by first class mail to the manager or the managing member of the limited liability company at the last known address for the manager or the managing member shown on the records of the commissioner. If the name and address of the manager or managing members are not shown on the records of the commissioner, the commissioner is not required to mail the notice to the manager or managing member. If the item mailed to the manager or managing member is returned to the department, the commissioner is not required to mail the item again. If the address shown on the records of the commissioner for a mailing after the initial certified mailing is not different from the address for the previous mailing, the commissioner is not required to mail the item to the same address, but shall mail the item to the next required addressee whose address is different from the address for the returned mailing, and, if none of the mailings required after a returned mailing has an address that is different from the address for the returned mailing, the commissioner is not required to mail the item again. In this subsection, “item” means the notice required under (b) of this section or the certificate of involuntary dissolution issued under (d) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 45 SLA 1999; am § 26 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 36(a), ch. 50, SLA 1999 provides that a limited liability company applying for reinstatement under (e) of this section on or after July 1, 1999 must comply with (e) of this section as amended by § 26, ch. 50, SLA 1999.
Section 36(b), ch. 50, SLA 1999 provides that the amendment to (e) of this section made by § 26, ch. 50, SLA 1999 does “not affect any cause of action that accrues before July 1, 1999.”

Sec. 10.50.410.
Authority to wind up.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement, the affairs of a limited liability company may be wound up by the

members or managers who have authority under AS

10.50.110

to manage the company before dissolution; or

superior court on the application of a member of the company or the member’s legal representative or assignee if

a member or manager identified in (1) of this subsection has engaged in wrongful conduct; or

other cause is shown.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.415.
Acts of winding up.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, a person winding up the affairs of a limited liability company may, in the name of, and for and on behalf of, the company,

prosecute and defend court actions;

settle and close the affairs of the company;

dispose of and transfer the property of the company;

discharge the liabilities of the company; and

distribute to the members the assets of the company.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.420.
Agency power of manager or member after dissolution.

Except as provided in (b) — (d) of this section, after dissolution of a limited liability company, a member having authority to wind up the company’s affairs can bind the company by an act that

is appropriate for winding up the company’s affairs or completing transactions unfinished at dissolution; or

would have bound the company if the company had not been dissolved, if the other party to the transaction does not have notice of the dissolution; in this paragraph, filing the articles of dissolution is presumed to constitute notice of the dissolution.

A member’s act that is not binding on the limited liability company under (a) of this section binds the company if the act is otherwise authorized by the company.

A member’s act that violates a restriction on the member’s authority does not bind the member’s limited liability company with regard to a person who knows about the restriction, even if the member’s act would otherwise be binding under (a) of this section or is otherwise authorized.

If the company is managed by a manager, a member does not have the authority to bind the company if the member is acting solely in the capacity of a member, and a manager of the company can bind the company by an act that

is appropriate for winding up the company’s affairs or completing transactions unfinished at dissolution; or

would have bound the company if the company had not been dissolved if the other party to the transaction does not have notice of the dissolution; in this paragraph, filing the articles of dissolution is presumed to constitute notice of the dissolution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.425.
Distribution of assets.

Upon the winding up of a limited liability company, the assets of the company shall be distributed in the following manner and order of priority:

payment, or adequate provision for payment, to creditors, including, to the extent permitted by law, members who are creditors and not covered by (2) of this section, in satisfaction of the liabilities of the company;

unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, payment to members or former members in satisfaction of the company’s liabilities for distributions under AS

10.50.295

—

10.50.330

;

unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, to members and former members in the following order of priority:

for the return of their contributions; and

in proportion to the members’ respective rights to share in distributions from the company before dissolution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 9 ch 78 SLA 1997)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 24(a), ch. 78, SLA 1997, a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997],” and a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997], if its articles of organization are amended on or after July 1, 1997, to state that the company is to be governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997].” For the text of this section in effect on June 30, 1997, see the 1996 volume for AS 10.

Sec. 10.50.430.
Articles of dissolution.

After the dissolution of a limited liability company under AS

10.50.400

, the limited liability company may file articles of dissolution with the department. The articles must state

the name of the company;

the date of filing of the company’s articles of organization and of any amendments to the articles of organization;

the reason for filing the articles of dissolution;

the effective date, which must be a specific date, of the articles of dissolution if the articles of dissolution are not to be effective when filed; and

other information determined appropriate by the members or managers filing the articles.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.435.
Known claims against dissolved limited liability company.

Upon dissolution, a limited liability company may dispose of the known claims against it by filing articles of dissolution under AS

10.50.430

and following the procedures described in this section.

A dissolved limited liability company shall notify its known claimants in writing of the dissolution at any time after the effective date of dissolution. The written notice must

describe the information that must be included in the claim;

provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent;

state the deadline, which may not be fewer than 120 days after the later of the date of the written notice or the filing of articles of dissolution under AS

10.50.430

, for the company to receive the claim; and

state that the claim is barred if it is not received by the company by the deadline.

A claim against a limited liability company is barred if a claimant

who was given written notice under (b) of this section does not deliver the claim to the company by the deadline; or

whose claim is rejected by the company does not begin a proceeding to enforce the claim within 90 days after the date of the rejection notice.

In this section, “claim” does not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.440.
Unknown claims against dissolved limited liability company.

If a limited liability company publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with (b) of this section and files articles of dissolution under AS

10.50.430

, the following claims are barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the claim against the company within three years after the later of the publication date of the newspaper notice or the filing of the articles of dissolution:

a claim by a claimant who did not receive written notice under AS

10.50.435

;

a claim sent within the time allowed if the company does not act on the claim;

a claim that is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

The notice published under (a) of this section shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the judicial district where the company’s principal office, or its registered office if it does not have a principal office in this state, is located in this state, and must

describe the information that must be included in a claim;

provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent;

state that a claim against the company is barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is begun within three years after the publication of the notice; and

request that persons with claims against the company present them in writing to the company as provided in the notice.

A claim may be enforced under this section

against the company to the extent of the company’s undistributed assets; or

if the company’s assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a member of the company to the extent of the member’s pro rata share of the claim or of the assets of the company distributed to the member in liquidation, whichever is less; a member’s total liability for all claims under this section may not exceed the total amount of assets of the company that are distributed to the member.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)